Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.353, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties; powers. (a) The school trust lands director shall: (1) act in a fiduciary capacity for trust beneficiaries in accordance with the principles under section 127A.351; (2) evaluate the school trust land asset position; (3) determine the estimated current and potential market value of school trust lands; (4) advise and provide recommendations to the governor on school trust land management policies and other policies that may affect the goal of the permanent school fund under section 127A.31; (5) advise and provide recommendations to the Executive Council and Land Exchange Board on all matters regarding school trust lands presented to either body; (6) advise and provide recommendations to the commissioner of natural resources on managing school trust lands, including but not limited to advice and recommendations on: (i) Department of Natural Resources school trust land management plans; (ii) leases of school trust lands; (iii) royalty agreements on school trust lands; (iv) land sales and exchanges; (v) cost certification; and (vi) deleted text begin revenue generatingdeleted text end new text begin revenue-generatingnew text end options; (7) serve as temporary trustee of school trust lands for school trust lands subject to proposed or active eminent domain proceedings; (8) serve as temporary trustee of school trust lands pursuant to section 94.342, subdivision 5; deleted text begin (9) submit to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission for review an annual budget and management plan for the director that includes proposed legislative changes that will improve the asset allocation of the school trust lands; deleted text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end develop and implement a ten-year strategic plan and a 25-year framework for management of school trust lands, in conjunction with the commissioner of natural resources, that is updated every five years, with goals to: (i) retain core real estate assets; (ii) increase the value of the real estate assets and the cash flow from those assets; (iii) rebalance the portfolio in assets with high performance potential and the strategic disposal of selected assets; (iv) establish priorities for management actions; (v) balance revenue enhancement and resource stewardship; and (vi) advance strategies on school trust lands to capitalize on ecosystem services markets; and deleted text begin (11) keep the beneficiaries, governor, legislature, and the public informed about the work of the director by reportingdeleted text end new text begin (10) reportnew text end to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission deleted text begin in a public meeting at least once during each calendar quarterdeleted text end new text begin as required under subdivision 5new text end . (b) In carrying out the duties under paragraph (a), the school trust lands director may: (1) direct and control money appropriated to the director; (2) establish job descriptions and employ staff within the limitations of money appropriated to the director; (3) enter into interdepartmental agreements with any other state agency; (4) enter into joint powers agreements under chapter 471; (5) evaluate and initiate real estate development projects on school trust lands in conjunction with the commissioner of natural resources and with the advice of the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission to generate long-term economic return to the permanent school fund; and (6) submit recommendations on strategies for school trust land leases, sales, or exchanges to the commissioner of natural resources and the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.353, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 each year, the school trust lands director must submit a written report to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission. The report must inform trust beneficiaries, the governor, the legislature, and the public about school trust land management activities, and must include information on: new text end new text begin (1) the director's efforts to develop and advocate for sustainable asset management strategies that reflect undivided loyalty to the trust beneficiaries; new text end new text begin (2) school trust land management policies and activities, including new or emerging revenue-generating opportunities; new text end new text begin (3) the financial position of school trust land assets, including management costs for the preceding fiscal year and the revenues deposited in the permanent school fund; new text end new text begin (4) recommended statutory changes that would improve asset allocation, enhance financial outcomes, or otherwise strengthen the long-term performance of school trust lands; and new text end new text begin (5) amounts distributed from the permanent school fund to Minnesota's public school districts and charter schools in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of education must provide the director with the data necessary to complete the report. new text end new text begin (c) The report must be submitted in accordance with section 3.195. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end